Hawaii statutes.
§468E-5 Eligibility for licensure. To
be eligible for licensure by the board as a speech pathologist or audiologist,
a person shall:

(1) Possess at least a master's degree or its
equivalent in the area of speech pathology or audiology, as the case may be,
from an educational institution recognized by the board;

(2) Submit to the board evidence of eligibility for
meeting the requirements of the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association
for the certificate of clinical competence in speech pathology or audiology, or
both; and

(3) Pass a written examination approved by the board.
[L 1974, c 48, pt of §1; am L 1978, c 21, §1; am L 1988, c 320, §4; am L 1996,
c 13, §14]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next